Utah statutes.
26-38-9.   Enforcement of chapter.

(1)  The state Department of Health and local health departments shall:

(a)  enforce this chapter and shall coordinate their efforts to promote the most effective enforcement of this chapter; and

(b)  impose the penalties under Subsection 26-38-8 in accordance with this section.

(2)  When enforcing this chapter, the state Department of Health and the local health departments shall notify persons of alleged violations of this chapter, conduct hearings, and impose penalties in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.

(3)  Civil penalties collected under this section by:

(a)  a local health department shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the violation was committed; and

(b)  the state Department of Health shall be deposited in the General Fund.

